Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 3. Transitional Assistance.

Sec. 29.05.180.
Organization grants to cities.

To defray the cost of transition to city government and to provide for interim government operations, each city incorporated after December 31, 1985 is entitled to an organization grant of $50,000 for the first full or partial fiscal year after incorporation.

To defray the cost of reclassification, each second class city in the unorganized borough incorporated before January 1, 1986 that reclassifies as a first class city or adopts a home rule charter after December 31, 1985 is entitled to an organization grant equal to $50,000 for the first full or partial fiscal year after reclassification.

The department shall disburse an organization grant under (a) or (b) of this section within 30 days after certification of the incorporation, reclassification, or home rule charter election, or as soon after certification as money is appropriated and available for the purpose.

A city entitled to an organization grant under (a) or (b) of this section is entitled to a second organization grant of $25,000. The department shall disburse the second organization grant within 30 days after the beginning of the city’s second fiscal year after incorporation, reclassification, or adoption of a home rule charter or as soon after that time as money is appropriated and available for the purpose.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A new municipality may use organization grant money issued to new municipalities under AS

29.05.180

—

29.05.190

for any public purpose that relates to the cost of transition or interim government operations. Costs of litigation challenging a Local Boundary Commission decision is a legitimate public purpose and is an allowed use under AS

29.05.180

—

29.05.190

. March 31, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.05.190.
Organization grants to boroughs and unified municipalities.

For the purpose of defraying the cost of transition to borough government and to provide for interim governmental operations, each borough or unified municipality incorporated after December 31, 1985, is entitled to organization grants as follows:

$300,000 for the municipality’s first full or partial fiscal year;

$200,000 for the municipality’s second fiscal year; and

$100,000 for the municipality’s third fiscal year.

The department shall disburse the first organization grant to a borough or unified municipality within 30 days after certification of the election favoring incorporation, or as soon after that as money is appropriated and available for the purpose. The second grant shall be disbursed within 30 days after the beginning of the municipality’s second fiscal year, or as soon after that as money is appropriated and available for the purpose. The third grant shall be disbursed within 30 days after the beginning of the municipality’s third fiscal year, or as soon after that as money is appropriated and available for the purpose.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, this section does not apply to a borough incorporated by consolidation or to a unified municipality that occupies the area formerly occupied by a borough.

For the purpose of defraying the cost of government transition, each third class borough that merges or consolidates with a city after January 1, 2002, and each municipality that unifies after January 1, 2002, in an area formerly occupied by a third class borough is entitled to an organization grant of $200,000 for the municipality’s first full or partial fiscal year after the merger or consolidation or after unification.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 12 ch 58 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 2002)

Sec. 29.05.200.
Organization grant program.

The organization grant program is established in the department. An appropriation made to the program shall be used for organization grants to municipalities that qualify under AS

29.05.180

or

29.05.190

.

Before August 31 of each fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the office of management and budget indicating

each municipality expected to qualify to receive an organization grant during the next fiscal year;

the amount of money needed to cover all organization grants expected to be awarded during the next fiscal year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1997; am § 22 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective April 4, 2006, substituted “office of management and budget” for “Department of Administration” in the introductory language of subsection (b).

Sec. 29.05.210.
Transitional assistance to boroughs and unified municipalities.

Within 30 days after the date of incorporation of a borough or unified municipality incorporated after December 31, 1985, the department shall determine the population of the borough or unified municipality.

The department shall provide assistance to each borough and unified municipality incorporated after December 31, 1985, in

establishing the initial sales and use tax assessment and collection department if the borough or unified municipality has adopted a sales or use tax;

determining the initial property tax assessment roll if the borough or unified municipality has adopted a property tax, including contracting for appraisals of property needed to complete the initial assessment.

This section does not apply to a borough incorporated by consolidation or to a unified municipality that occupies the area formerly occupied by a borough.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 13 ch 58 SLA 1994)